src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Komi-Permyak LANGUAGE.

# Definitions for Multichar_Symbols

## Analysis symbols
The morphological analyses of wordforms for the Komi-Permyak
language are presented in this system in terms of the following symbols.
(It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).

The parts-of-speech tags are:
* **+A**:  adjective
* **+Adp**:  Adposition
* **+Adv**:  adverb
* **+CS**:  subordinating conjunction
* **+CC**:  coordinating conjunction
* **+Interj**:  interjection
* **+N**:  noun
* **+Pcle**:  particle
* **+Po**:  postposition
* **+Pr**:  preposition
* **+Pron**:  pronoun
* **+Qnt**:  Quantifier
* **+V**:  verb

The parts of speech are further split up into:
Adjectives

Adverbs
These are ideophonic descriptors used to modify the verb
вырк ливтясь "**flit** and it flew off"
* **+Deg** Degree depricate AdA
Ad-adjective
with reference to type of adverb
spatial
temporal
multiplicative, i.e. iterations
* **+Parenthetic** parenthetical phrase

Interjections
 +Conative   Used for calling animals, for example

Nouns
proper
used with paired nouns **collective nouns**
* **+Relat** relational noun: выв, ув

Postpositions

## Pronouns
* **+Dem**:  demonstrative
* **+Indef**:  indefinite
* **+Interr**:  interrogative
* **+Pers**:  personal
* **+Recipr**:  reciprocal
* **+Refl**:  reflexive
* **+Rel**:  relative
* **+Tot**:  universal кыкнан; кыкнанным

## Quantifiers (numerals)
Quantifiers and Numerals are classified under:
* **+Num**:  numeral
* **+Appr**:  Approximative numeral кавто-колмо, колмошка *two or three*
NB! do not confuse with Komi case +Apr
* **+AssocColl**:  -ne- ; avide-
* **+Assoc**:  +мезть
* **+Card**:  cardinal + NCard
* **+Coll**:  collective
* **+Distr**:  Distributive
* **+Iter: Iterative form expressing number of times; kpv**:  `кыкысь`
* **+Ord**:  ordinal + NOrd
* **+Coord**:  Coordinates, i.e. 65˚36′8,30″ in numerals.lexc
* **+Cop**:  this is for copula complement position with pl in -ӧсь Pred depricated

## Nominals are inflected for Number and Case
## Number
singular
plural
## Case
accusative -ӧс
ablative case -лісь
approximative -лань
approximative egressive -ланьсянь
approximative elative -ланьысь
approximative illative -ланьӧ
approximative inessive -ланьын
approximative prolative -ланьӧт
approximative terminative -ланьӧдз
approximative terminative -ланьви
carative -тӧг
consecultative -ла
Comitative -кӧт
Comparative case form -ся
*  **+Cmpl**  Postposition complement
dative case -лӧ
egressive -сянь
elative -ысь
genitive case -лӧн
illative -ӧ
inessive -ын
instrumental -ӧн
nominative case
prolative -ӧт
Terminative -ви
Terminative -ӧдз
Vocative

transitive THIS should be removed 2019-11-01

used when possessive marking occurs before case
used when case occurs before possessive marking

this will be used for marking complement forms such as кыкнан in collective numerals, сы , which can only appear with a following NP. DO WE NEED THIS 2019-10-22? jaska Niko

## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
* **»7**:  Literal »
* **«7**:  Literal «
```
 %[%>%]  - Literal >
 %[%<%]  - Literal <
```

The possession is marked as such:
ODD

The comparative forms are:
* **+Comp**:  comparative
* **+Superl**:  superlative
* **+Mdr**:  moderative -моз, -кодь  'kind of, -ish' with reference to quality ыджыткодь 'rather big'
* **+Aug**:  augmentative, intensive -ӧв 'too X' with reference to quality ыджытӧв 'too big'
*  **+Der/AdvCompMod** Adverbial comparative modifier in моз Der/моз +MOZ  diminishing, kind of, sort of
*  **+Der/CompMod** comparative modifier in кодь Der/кодь ! diminishing, kind of, sort of

Numerals are classified under:

Verb moods are:
* **+Imprt**:  imperative
* **+Ind**:  indicative
* **+Prs**:  present      -ӧ
* **+Prt1**:  preterite 1 -ис
* **+Prt2**:  preterite 2 -ӧма
* **+Fut**:  future      -ас
* **+Prec**:  Precative mood is a directive mood that signals that the utterance is a request. -ко on imperative forms equals Precative
Verb personal forms are:
Other verb forms are
Gerund This is used with derivations

* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
Special symbols are classified with:
The verbs are syntactically split according to transitivity:
Special multiword units are analysed with:
Non-dictionary words can be recognised with:

Question and Focus particles:

### Tags distinguishing different versions of the same lemma (before POS)
* +v1
* +v2
* +v3
* +v4
* +v5
* +v6
* +v7
* +v8
* +v9
* +v10
* +v11
* +v12
* +v13
* +v14
* +v15

The Usage extents are marked using following tags:
* **+Use/GC** – **only** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/-GC** – **never** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
Дӧсвидзисьсянь, prevents soft sign loss

* +URL * For tagging URLs

Where do these come from source
* **+Src/F** foreign source apparently 2015-09-08
* **+Dimin** diminutive,  words that are already -ok dimin

* **+Sem/Act** Activity
* **+Sem/Amount** Amount
* **+Sem/Ani** Animate
* **+Sem/Aniprod** Animal Product
* **+Sem/Ant** Antroponym
* **+Sem/Ant-Fem** Female Antroponym
* **+Sem/Ant-Mal** Male Antroponym
* **+Sem/Body** Bodypart
* **+Sem/Body-abstr** siellu, vuoig?a, jierbmi
* **+Sem/Build** Building
* **+Sem/Build-part** Part of Bulding, like the closet
* **+Sem/Cat** Category
* **+Sem/Clth** Clothes
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl** Jewelery
* **+Sem/Clth-part** part of clothes, boallu, sávdnji...
* **+Sem/Ctain** Container
* **+Sem/Ctain-abstr** Abstract container like bank account
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth**
* **+Sem/Curr** Currency like dollár, Not Money
* **+Sem/Dance** Dance
* **+Sem/Dir** Direction like GPS-kursa
* **+Sem/Domain** Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions)
* **+Sem/Drink** Drink
* **+Sem/Dummytag** Dummytag
* **+Sem/Edu** Educational event
* **+Sem/Event** Event
* **+Sem/Feat** Feature, like Árvu
* **+Sem/Feat-phys** Physiological feature, ivdni, fárda
* **+Sem/Feat-psych** Psychological feauture
* **+Sem/Feat-measr** Psychological feauture
* **+Sem/Fem** Female name
* **+Sem/Food** Food
* **+Sem/Food-med** Medicine
* **+Sem/Furn** Furniture
* **+Sem/Game** Game
* **+Sem/Geom** Geometrical object
* **+Sem/Group** Animal or Human Group
* **+Sem/Hum** Human
* **+Sem/Hum-abstr** Human abstract
* **+Sem/Hum-prof** Human professional
* **+Sem/Ideol** Ideology
* **+Sem/Lang** Language
* **+Sem/Mal** Male name
* **+Sem/Mat** Material for producing things
* **+Sem/Measr** Measure
* **+Sem/Money** Has to do with money, like wages, not Curr(ency)
* **+Sem/Obj** Object
* **+Sem/Obj-clo** Cloth
* **+Sem/Obj-cogn** Cloth
* **+Sem/Obj-el** (Electrical) machine or apparatus
* **+Sem/Obj-ling** Object with something written on it
* **+Sem/Obj-rope** flexible ropelike object
* **+Sem/Obj-surfc** Surface object
* **+Sem/Org** Organisation
* **+Sem/Part** Feature, oassi, bealli
* **+Sem/Patr** Patronymic
* **+Sem/Patr-Fem** Female Patronymic
* **+Sem/Patr-Mal** Male Patronymic
* **+Sem/Perc-cogn** Cognative perception
* **+Sem/Perc-emo** Emotional perception
* **+Sem/Perc-phys** Physical perception
* **+Sem/Perc-psych** Physical perception
* **+Sem/Plant** Plant
* **+Sem/Plant-part** Plant part
* **+Sem/Plc** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr** Abstract place
* **+Sem/Plc-elevate** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-line** Place
* **+Sem/Plc-water** Place
* **+Sem/Pos** Position (as in social position job)
* **+Sem/Process** Process
* **+Sem/Prod** Product
* **+Sem/Prod-audio** Audio product
* **+Sem/Prod-cogn** Cognition product
* **+Sem/Prod-ling** Linguistic product
* **+Sem/Prod-vis** Visual product
* **+Sem/Rel** Relation
* **+Sem/Route** Name of a Route
* **+Sem/Rule** Rule or convention
* **+Sem/Semcon** Semantic concept
* **+Sem/Sign** Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation) 
* **+Sem/Sport** Sport
* **+Sem/State** 
* **+Sem/State-sick** Illness
* **+Sem/Substnc** Substance, like Air and Water
* **+Sem/Sur** Surname
* **+Sem/Sur-Fem** Surname
* **+Sem/Sur-Mal** Surname
* **+Sem/Symbol** Symbol
* **+Sem/Time** Time
* **+Sem/Tool** Prototypical tool for repairing things
* **+Sem/Tool-catch** Tool used for catching (e.g. fish)
* **+Sem/Tool-clean** Tool used for cleaning
* **+Sem/Tool-it** Tool used in IT
* **+Sem/Tool-measr** Tool used for measuring
* **+Sem/Tool-music** Music instrument
* **+Sem/Tool-write** Writing tool
* **+Sem/Txt** Text (girji, lávlla...)
* **+Sem/Veh** Vehicle
* **+Sem/Wpn** Weapon
* **+Sem/Wthr** The Weather or the state of ground

Semantics are classified with
* **+Sem/Inanim**  Inanimate,
* **+Sem/NonHum**  Nonhuman,

Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
source and target part-of-speech.

* **+Der/ісь** Der/ысь

*  **+Der/PrivMod** privative or abessive modifier -тӧм AbeMod
*  **+Der/LocMod** locative modifier са - IneMod
*  **+Der/ProprietiveMod** habeo modifier HabObjMod Der/а
*  **+Der/TempMod** temporal modifier ся -

2012-09-11 Perhaps this is only syntactic

Tags for Ethymological Origin marking. This has initially used used with proper nouns

Morphophonology
To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
symbols in the lexicon files:

And following triggers to control variation
* %^1Cns    Plural-initial; it allows for doubling of consonant
* %^LVBound     boundary for LV change instead of Consonant or end of word
* %^VowRM       vowel syncope
* %^SoftRet     soft sign retention Дӧсвидзисьсянь (Bible); literary norm Дӧсвидзиссянь (possibly ambiguous somewhere)

* »
* «
* > (escaped with square brackets, to avoid collision with > as morpheme boundary)
* < (escaped with square brackets, to avoid collision with < as morpheme boundary)

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS

Removal

|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj

The word forms in the KOMI-PERMYAK language start from the lexeme roots of basic

word classes, or optionally from prefixes:

Incoming from akusanat
Pron_koi2x ;

Incoming for conversion from kpv

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-koi/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
